Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-801
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that public libraries are vital to the quality of life in Nebraska communities and that public libraries provide access to information resources for the personal, educational, and vocational needs of the citizens. The Legislature further finds that public library services can be improved by permitting creative and flexible means of library governance and organization. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage cooperation and collaboration among political subdivisions to assure access to public library services for every Nebraskan.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 1.